District of Columbia statutes.
2-1226.40a

Power and authority.

With respect to projects that are subject to this part and projects completed for off-site mitigation or payment in lieu of mitigation, DDOE shall have the authority to:

(1)

Monitor, inspect, review, approve, approve with conditions and covenants, and deny approval;

(2)

Require monitoring, sampling, analysis, record-keeping and certification of ongoing compliance;

(3)

Establish provisions, requirements, and penalties for off-site mitigation or payment in lieu of mitigation options, and for projects that fail to comply with their off-site mitigation or payment-in-lieu-of-mitigation requirements; and

(4)

Recover costs, fees and expenses.

History

Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 460a
as added Oct. 23, 2012, D.C. Law 19-192, § 2(h), 59 DCR 10174

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-192 added this section.